Washington statutes.
RCW 41.26.035

"Minimum medical and health standards" defined.

The term "minimum medical and health standards" means minimum medical and health standards adopted by the department under this chapter.

[ 1991 c 35 s 14; 1971 ex.s. c 257 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.

Purpose—Severability—1971 ex.s. c 257: See notes following RCW 41.26.030.